tests/N-gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../bua.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../bua.automorf.hfst


Tests:
  "-{г}{A}й genitive, consonant-final":
    ном<n><gen> : номой
    морин<n><gen> : мориной
    һанаан<n><gen> : һанаанай

  "-{г}{A}й genitive, vowel-final":
    жороо<n><nom> : жороо
    жороо<n><gen> : жороогой
  
  "-{г}{A}й genitive, ң-final":
    ан<n><nom> : ан
    ан<n><gen> : ангай

  "-ин genitive":
    аха<n><gen> : ахын
    уула<n><gen> : уулын
    һургуули<n><gen> : һургуулиин

  "-ин genitive, diphthong final":
    нохой<n><gen> : нохойн

  "stems with {н}":
    наһан<n><gen> :     [наһанай, наһай]
    хурдан<n><gen> :     [хурданай, хурдай]
    хулгайшан<n><gen> :     [хулгайшанай, хулгайшай]

  "Miscellaneous genitive"
    курс<n><gen> : курсын
    шонхо<n><gen> : шонхын
    кино<n><gen> : киногой
    кэксэ<n><gen> : кексын
    дугы<n><gen> : дугын
    эжы<n><gen> : эжын
    үнэн<n><gen> : үнэнэй
    үһэн<n><gen> : үһэнэй
    хүн<n><gen> : хүнэй
    хото<n><gen> : хотын
    һагба<n><gen> : һагбын   
    һалхин<n><gen> : һалхинай
    һара<n><gen> : һарын
    заан<n><gen> : заанай
    жэмэс<n><gen> : жэмэсэй
    нюдэн<n><gen> : нюдэнэй
    газар<n><gen> : газарай
    бэшэг<n><gen> : бэшэгэй
    бүлэ<n><gen> : бүлын
    ваза<n><gen> : вазын
